Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-40] Hold harmless for
independent review organizations. No independent review organization or
clinical reviewer working on behalf of an independent review organization or an
employee, agent, or contractor of an independent review organization shall be
liable in damages to any person for any opinions rendered or acts or omissions
performed within the scope of the organization's or person's duties under the
law during or upon completion of an external review conducted pursuant to this
part, unless the opinion was rendered or the act or omission was performed in
bad faith or involved gross negligence. [L 2011, c 230, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next